Illinois, session 104th, SB2557.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 1. The sum of $535,000, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Civil Service Commission to meet its operational expenses 8for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.